Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.097

Records and reports accompany defendant upon transfer.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

A copy of relevant records and reports as defined by the department, in consultation with the department of corrections, made pursuant to this chapter, and including relevant information necessary to meet the requirements of RCW 10.77.065(1) and 10.77.084, shall accompany the defendant upon transfer to a mental health facility or a correctional institution or facility.

[ 2008 c 213 s 3; 2000 c 74 s 4; 1998 c 297 s 47.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 74: See note following RCW 10.77.060.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.